Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Oil and Gas Conservation
353.595.
Notice to surface owner of intent to drill oil or gas well — Compensation for damage to surface — Restoration of surface.

As used in this section:

“Person” means any natural person, corporation, firm, partnership, venture, receiver, trustee, executor, administrator, guardian, fiduciary, or other representative of any kind, and includes any government or any political subdivision or agency thereof.

“Drilling operations” means the drilling, deepening, or conversion of a well for oil or gas production, core hole for oil or gas purposes, or drill hole for a stratigraphic test for oil or gas purposes.

“Entry” means the moving upon the surface of land with equipment to commence drilling operations, but shall not include entry for the survey for or ascertaining or identification of a well location.

“Operator” means the person, whether the owner or not, who applies for or holds a permit for drilling operations or who is named as the principal on a bond for a permit for a well that was issued by the department.

“Surface owner” means the person in whose name the surface of the land on which drilling operations are contemplated, and who is assessed for purposes of taxes imposed according to the records of the property valuation administrator of the county where the land is located as certified by the property valuation administrator.

“Production operation” means the operation of a well for the production of oil or gas, including all acts, structures, equipment, and roadways necessary for the operation.

“New well” means a well that is spudded after July 13, 1990, and does not utilize any part of a well bore or drilling location that existed prior to July 13, 1990.

“Completion of the well” means completion of those processes necessary before production occurs, including the laying of flow lines and the construction of the tank battery. If the well is not productive, the date of completion of the well shall be the day it is plugged and abandoned.

This section shall be applicable only for the drilling operations of new wells except as provided in subsection (7) of this section. This section shall not apply for reworking operations on a well. This section shall be applicable only when the surface owner has not consented in writing to the drilling operations and:

There has been a complete severance of the ownership of the oil and gas from the ownership of the surface; or

The surface owner owns an interest in the oil and gas.

Prior to commencement of the drilling of a well, the operator shall give written notice to the surface owner of the operator’s intent to commence drilling operations.

The operator shall, for the purpose of giving notice, secure from the property valuation administrator’s office, within ninety (90) days prior to the giving of the notice, a certification which shall identify the person in whose name the lands on which drilling operations are to be commenced and who is assessed at the time the certification is made. The written certification made by the property valuation administrator of the surface owner shall be conclusive evidence of the surface ownership.

The notice required to be given by the operator to the surface owner shall identify the following:

The location of the proposed entry on the surface for drilling operations and the date on or after which drilling operations shall commence.

A photocopy of the drilling application to the department for the well to be drilled.

The name, address, and telephone number of the operator.

An offer to discuss with the surface owner those matters set forth in subsection (4) of this section prior to commencement of drilling operations.

If the surface owner elects to meet the operator, the surface owner shall request the operator to schedule a meeting at a mutually agreed time and place within the limitations set forth herein. Failure of the surface owner to contact the operator at least five (5) days prior to the proposed commencement of drilling operations shall be conclusively deemed a waiver of the right to meet by the surface owner. The meeting shall be scheduled between the hours of nine o’clock in the morning and the setting of the sun of the same day and shall be at least three (3) days prior to commencement of drilling operations. Unless agreed to otherwise, the place shall be located within the county in which drilling operations are to be commenced where the operator or his agent shall be available to discuss with the surface owner or his agent those matters set forth in subsection (4) of this section.

The notice shall be given to the surface owner by either:

Certified mail addressed to the surface owner at the address shown in the certification obtained from the property valuation administrator, which shall be postmarked at least ten (10) days prior to the commencement of drilling operations; or

Personal delivery to the surface owner at least eight (8) days prior to the commencement of drilling operations.

Notice to the surface owner as defined in this section shall be deemed conclusive notice to the record owners of all interest in the surface.

The operator, or his agent shall, if the surface owner accepts the offer to discuss, be available at the time agreed, date, and place to discuss with the surface owner the following:

Placement of roads to be constructed by the operator;

Points of entry upon the surface for drilling operations;

Construction and placement of pits used for drilling operations;

Restoration of fences to be cut in order to make entry upon the surface for drilling operations;

Use of water on the surface of the lands;

Removal of trees; and

Surface water drainage changes caused by drilling operations.

The surface owner shall be entitled to reasonable compensation from the operator for damages to growing crops, trees, shrubs, fences, roads, structures, improvements, and livestock thereon caused by the drilling of a new well. The surface owner shall be entitled to reasonable compensation from the operator for subsequent damages to growing crops, trees, shrubs, fences, roads, structures, improvements, and livestock caused by subsequent production operations of the operator thereon. The surface owner shall be entitled to reasonable compensation for all negligent acts of the operator that cause measurable damage to the productive capacity of the soil. In addition, the operator shall not utilize any more of the surface estate than is reasonably necessary for the exploration, production and development of the mineral estate.

The compensation required pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall be paid in any manner mutually agreed upon by the operator and the surface owner, but the failure to agree upon, or make the compensation required, shall not prevent the operator from commencement of drilling operations. The operator shall tender to the surface owner payment by check or draft in accordance with the provisions of this section no later than ninety (90) days after completion of the well. The surface owner’s remedy shall be an action for compensation in the Circuit Court in which the lands, or the greater part thereof, are located on which drilling operations were conducted. If the operator fails to tender payment within the ninety (90) day period or if the tender is not reasonable, the surface owner shall be entitled to reasonable compensation as provided in this section, as well as attorney’s fees. If the operator relies on a third-party appraiser’s assessment of damages there shall be no award of attorney’s fees.

In conjunction with the plugging and abandonment of any well or the reworking of any well, the operator shall restore the surface and any improvements thereon to a condition as near as practicable to their condition prior to commencement of the work. The surface owner and operator may waive this requirement in writing, subject to the approval of the department that the waiver is in accordance with its administrative regulations.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to diminish the rights of the operator or surface owner as they exist by established common law. Any compensation paid and accepted pursuant to the provisions of subsections (5) and (6) of this section shall be a complete bar to the assertion of any other remedy for such damages.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 128, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

353.597.
Replacement of disrupted water supply by well operator.

A well operator shall replace the water supply of any owner of interest in real property who obtains all or part of his supply of water for domestic, agriculture, industrial, or other legitimate use from an underground or surface source where the supply has been substantially disrupted by contamination, diminution, or interruption proximately resulting from the operator’s oil or gas operation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 127, § 3, effective July 15, 1994.

353.600.
Copy of plat to be sent to owner or operator of coal-bearing stratum underlying well. [Repealed.]

353.610.
Conditions under which permits may be issued — Exceptions.

Except as provided in KRS

353.500

to

353.720

, no permits shall be issued for the drilling, deepening, or reopening of any shallow well for the production of oil, unless the proposed location of the well shall be at least three hundred thirty (330) feet from the nearest mineral boundary of the premises upon which the well is to be drilled, deepened or reopened; and, the proposed location must be at least six hundred sixty (660) feet from the nearest oil producing well. This subsection shall not be construed to regulate the distance between wells which do not produce oil from the same pool.

Except as provided in KRS

353.500

to

353.720

, no permit shall be issued for the drilling, deepening or reopening of any shallow well for the production of gas unless the proposed location of the well shall be at least five hundred (500) feet from the nearest mineral boundary of the premises upon which such well is to be drilled, deepened or reopened; and, the proposed location must be at least one thousand (1,000) feet from the nearest gas producing well. This subsection shall not be construed to regulate the distance between wells which do not produce gas from the same pool.

This section shall not apply:

To wells drilled, deepened, or reopened for the injection of water, gas or other fluids into an oil or gas producing formation.

To any well drilled, deepened or reopened in a pool or portion thereof, which is included in a secondary recovery program commenced or proposed, if the location or proposed location of the well conforms to a geometric pattern already established on all premises which will be offset and affected by the well.

To wells drilled or deepened as water supply wells and geological or structure test holes; or

To premises within the limits of any incorporated city which has enacted or enacts hereafter an ordinance regulating the location or spacing of wells for the production of oil and gas at distances of not less than the distances prescribed in this section.

To wells for the production of oil to be drilled, deepened, or reopened and completed at a depth of less than two thousand (2,000) feet where there are no workable beds of coal at lesser depths and the formation from which the oil is expected to be extracted is not appreciably affected by factors, as determined by the commissioner, other than natural drainage. The location of wells for the production of oil coming within this exception shall be at least two hundred (200) feet from the nearest boundary of the premises upon which the well is to be drilled, deepened or reopened; and the proposed location must be at least four hundred (400) feet from the nearest oil producing well. This subsection shall not be construed to regulate the distance between wells which do not produce from the same pool.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 13; 1966, ch. 147, § 3; 1974, ch. 45, § 4; 1976, ch. 134, § 1; 2003, ch. 150, § 12, effective June 24, 2003; 2019 ch. 44, § 32, effective June 27, 2019.

353.620.
Variance from requirements of KRS 353.610 — Review under KRS 353.700.

Notwithstanding KRS

353.610

, if an application is submitted for a permit to drill, deepen, or reopen a well closer to a boundary or to another well than prescribed in KRS

353.610

and the application is accompanied by the written consent of all owners of oil and gas interests within the distance prescribed in KRS 353.610, which will be offset by the proposed well, the department shall issue a permit for the well.

Notwithstanding KRS

353.610

, if an application is submitted for a permit to drill, deepen, or reopen a well closer to a boundary or to another well than prescribed in KRS

353.610

, and the director determines after notice to all owners of oil and gas interests within the distance prescribed in KRS 353.610 that topographical or other factors delineated by subsurface geologic mapping or reservoir analytical data make compliance with the requirements of KRS 353.610 unduly burdensome, or in conflict with reasonably prudent methods and practices for the production of oil or gas, the department may issue a permit for the well. The application may include but not be limited to core analysis, geophysical or electric log data, reservoir pressure analysis, or other information demonstrating to the satisfaction of the director that such relief is warranted.

Notwithstanding KRS

353.610

, the department shall issue a permit for a well to be drilled, deepened, or reopened closer to a boundary than prescribed in KRS

353.610

if a pooling order has been issued pursuant to KRS

353.630

.

If a permit is issued to drill, deepen, or reopen a well under subsection (1) or (2) of this section at a location closer to a well or boundary than prescribed in KRS

353.610

, the department shall permit a like variance from the requirements of KRS

353.610

on all premises offset and adversely affected by the well.

Any order or final determination of the department under this section shall be subject to review in accordance with KRS

353.700

and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 14; 2000, ch. 268, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 150, § 13, effective June 24, 2003; 2018 ch. 94, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.

353.630.
Pooling of oil and gas interests — Conditions — Review under KRS 353.700.

Whenever any separate tract of land is so situated because of size or other condition that it does not contain a location at which a well for oil or gas may be drilled, deepened, or reopened by reason of the spacing provisions of KRS

353.610

, the department shall order, after notice and, for those required to be given notice, opportunity for comment within thirty (30) days of the date shown on the postal service proof of mailing or, where notice is provided by publication, within thirty (30) days of the date of the publication, the pooling of all oil and gas interests in the separate tract or in a portion thereof with all like interests in a contiguous tract or tracts, or portions thereof, as are necessary to afford the pooled tracts one (1) location for the drilling, deepening, or reopening of a well for the production of oil or gas in compliance with the spacing requirements of KRS

353.500

to

353.720

. The department shall require the development and operation of all pooled acreage as a single leasehold estate in accordance with regulations and rules promulgated under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

.

Whenever an operator proposes to drill, deepen, or reopen a well at a location that would require the pooling of separate tracts or interests in order to comply with the spacing requirements of KRS

353.610

, and the operator has secured the written consent or agreement from the owners of at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the interests in each tract, or portions thereof, included in the proposed pooled acreage, the department shall, where it finds that the requirements of this subsection have been met, order, after notice, and for those required to be given notice, opportunity for comment within thirty (30) days of the date shown on the postal service proof of mailing or, where notice is provided by publication, within thirty (30) days of the date of the publication, the pooling of all oil and gas interests in all tracts, or portions thereof, that are included within the proposed pooled acreage as established by the spacing requirements of KRS

353.610

. A pooling order shall be made only after the applicant provides notice to all persons reasonably known to own an oil or gas interest in any tract or portion thereof that is proposed to be pooled. For purposes of this section, any unknown or nonlocatable owners shall be deemed to have consented or agreed to the pooling, provided that the operator has complied with the publication requirements of KRS 353.640(1) with respect to the unknown or nonlocatable owners. The department shall issue a permit to drill, deepen, or reopen the well and require the development and operation of the pooled acreage as a single leasehold estate in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

.

Whenever an operator proposes to drill, deepen, or reopen a well at a location that would require the pooling of interests or tracts in order to comply with the spacing requirements of KRS

353.610

, and the operator owns or controls the right to develop the oil and gas underlying one hundred percent (100%) of the interests in each tract, or portions thereof, included in the proposed pooled acreage, the department shall, where it finds that the requirements of this subsection have been met, order, after notice and, for those required to be given notice, opportunity for comment within thirty (30) days of the date shown on the postal service proof of mailing or, where notice is provided by publication, within thirty (30) days of the date of the publication, the pooling of all oil and gas interests in all tracts, or portions thereof, that are included within the proposed pooled acreage established by the spacing requirements of KRS

353.610

. A pooling order shall be made only after the applicant provides notice to all persons reasonably known to own an oil or gas interest in any tract or a portion thereof proposed to be pooled. For purposes of this section, any unknown or nonlocatable owners shall be deemed to have consented or agreed to the pooling, provided that the operator has complied with the publication requirements as set forth in KRS 353.640(1) with respect to the unknown or nonlocatable owners. The department shall issue a permit to drill, deepen, or reopen the well and require the development and operation of all pooled tracts as a single leasehold estate in accordance with administrative regulations promulgated under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

.

No pooling as permitted by this section shall be ordered except:

When an application has been filed to drill, deepen, or reopen a well within the distance limitations prescribed in KRS

353.610

; and

When a lessee or owner of an oil or gas interest in the tract shall request the pooling.

No pooling as permitted by this section shall be ordered with respect to any tract or portion thereof upon which a well is drilled, deepened, or reopened:

Unless the pooling was requested prior to the commencement of the drilling, deepening, or reopening of the well by a lessee or owner of an oil and gas interest in a contiguous tract pursuant to subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section; and

Unless the request, if made by the owner of an operating interest who elects to participate in the risk and cost of the drilling, deepening, or reopening of the well, is accompanied by a bond or other security satisfactory to and in an amount set by the director for the payment of such owner’s share of the cost of drilling, deepening, or reopening the well.

Production from any well which is ordered pooled pursuant to KRS

353.500

to

353.720

shall be deemed for all purposes to have been so produced from each tract or portion thereof included in the pool in proportion to the amounts established in the pooling order.

Any order or final determination of the department under this is section shall be subject to review in accordance with KRS

353.700

and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 15; 1986, ch. 233, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2000, ch. 268, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2003, ch. 150, § 14, effective June 24, 2003; 2018 ch. 94, § 8, effective July 14, 2018.

353.640.
Pooling order — Notice — Provisions — Surrender or sharing of interest — Limited participation — Review under KRS 353.700.

The operator shall provide a list to the department of all persons reasonably known to own an oil or gas interest in any tract, or portion thereof, proposed to be pooled in an application to the department for a pooling order. A pooling order shall be made only after the applicant provides notice to all persons reasonably known to own an oil or gas interest in any tract, or a portion thereof, proposed to be pooled. In the event of the filing of an application for a pooling order under KRS 353.630(2) where unknown owners or nonlocatable owners exist, the operator shall cause to be published, not more than thirty (30) days prior to the submission of an application for pooling, one (1) notice in the newspaper of the largest circulation in each county in which any tract, or portion thereof, proposed to be pooled is located. The notice shall:

State that an application for a pooling order is being filed with the division;

Describe any tract, or portion thereof, proposed to be pooled;

In the case of an unknown owner, identify the name of the last known owner;

In the case of a nonlocatable owner, identify the owner and the owner’s last known address; and

State that any party claiming an interest in any tract, or portion thereof, proposed to be pooled should contact the operator at the published address and provide a copy of the notification to the director within twenty (20) days of the date of publication.

The applicant shall file proof of notice with the division concurrently with the application.

A pooling order shall authorize the drilling, deepening, or reopening, and the operation of a well for the production of oil or gas on the tracts or portions thereof pooled; shall designate the operator to drill and operate the well; shall prescribe the time and manner in which all owners of operating interests in the pooled tracts or portions thereof may elect to participate therein; shall provide that all reasonable costs and expenses of drilling, deepening, or reopening, and the completing, operating, plugging, and abandoning the well shall be borne, and all production from the well shall be shared by all owners of operating interests in proportion to the net mineral acres in the pooled tracts owned or under lease to each owner; and shall make provision for the payment of the reasonable actual cost thereof, including a reasonable charge for supervision, by all those who elect to participate therein.

A pooling order shall establish a procedure for the owner of an operating interest who does not decide to become a participating operator to elect to either:

Surrender, by means of sale or lease, the interest to a participating operator on a reasonable basis and for a reasonable consideration, which if not agreed upon shall be determined by the director; or

Share in the operation of the well as a nonparticipating operator on a carried basis after the proceeds allocable to his or her share equal two hundred percent (200%) of the share of the costs allocable to his or her interest.

An oil or gas owner whose identity and location remain unknown after thirty (30) days has passed from the date of publication required by subsection (1) of this section and whose interest is pooled pursuant to KRS 353.630(3) shall be deemed to have elected to lease the interest to the oil or gas operator, exclusive of one-eighth (1/8) of the production attributable to the unleased interest, and shall not be entitled to make the election established in subsection (3) of this section.

Except as provided in this subsection, an oil or gas owner who does not make an election under the pooling order within thirty (30) days of the entry of the order shall be deemed to have leased the oil or gas interest to the oil or gas well operator in the manner established in subsection (4) of this section. If the holder of an operating interest has obtained the interest by lease or other agreement granting the right to conduct operations to anyone other than the holder of the oil and gas estate, and if the owner of the operating interest does not make an election under the pooling order, the holder of the operating interest shall be deemed to have elected to share in the operation of the well as a nonparticipating operator on a carried basis after the proceeds allocable to his or her share equal two hundred percent (200%) of the share of the costs allocable to his or her interest.

A person whose interest is subject to an oil or gas lease or other agreement which grants to another the right to operate or conduct operations shall not own an operating interest for the purposes of subsection (3) of this section.

The department shall provide a copy of the pooling order entered under KRS

353.500

to

353.720

to those required to be noticed. A certified copy of any pooling order shall be recorded by the operator in the office of the county clerk of the county or counties in which all or any portion of the pooled tract is located, and the record of the order, from the time of lodging the order for record, shall be deemed to be delivery of the order to all unknown or nonlocatable owners.

Any order or final determination of the department under this section shall be subject to review in accordance with KRS

353.700

and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 16; 1978, ch. 384, § 487, effective June 17, 1978; 2000, ch. 268, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 217, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 24, § 1909, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 94, § 9, effective July 14, 2018.

353.645.
Operation and development as a unit of oil and gas interests in a pool or pools — Application for unit — Hearing — Unitization order — Review under KRS 353.700.

This section applies to any lessee or owner of an oil and gas interest in a proposed unit.

The department, at its own discretion or upon the application of any lessee or owner of an oil and gas interest in a pool or pools of a proposed unit may, after notice to all lessees or owners of an oil and gas interest in a pool or pools of a proposed unit, issue an order for the operation and development as a unit of any pool or pools, or any portion thereof, for the production of oil and associated gas in order to increase their ultimate recovery by unitized operation and development so that each owner in the pool or pools shall have the opportunity to recover his fair and equitable share of the recoverable oil and gas in the unit. The department may require a reasonable application fee from a lessee or owner of an oil and gas interest applying for a proposed unit.

The application for a unit shall include the following:

A description of the area to be included in the unit, with a map attached, and a description of the pool or pools, or portions thereof, to be included within the unit;

A statement of the nature of the unit operations contemplated;

A proposed allocation of production and reserves among the separately-owned tracts and interests contributed to the unit. Reserves shall be calculated by industry standard methods supported by geological and engineering data, as determined to be appropriate by the department. The department may require an independent third party to verify the calculations as to proposed allocation of production or reserves;

The procedure upon which wells and equipment of the separately-owned tracts and interests are to be used and compensated for in unit operations; and

Documentation that the application is approved by at least fifty-one percent (51%) ownership in the interests proposed for inclusion in the unit.

After notice in the manner established in this section, the department shall issue a final order establishing a unit and requiring unit operation and development if it finds that:

The unitized operation and development of a pool or pools, or any portion thereof, for the production of oil and associated gas is reasonably necessary in order to effectively carry on operations for enhanced recovery, including but not limited to, increased density drilling, or secondary recovery operations by pressure-maintenance, repressuring, cycling, water flooding, tertiary recovery operations, or any combination of these, in order to substantially increase the ultimate recovery of oil and associated gas from the pool or pools within the unit, or to protect the correlative rights of affected mineral owners; and

The value of the additional recovery of oil and associated gas exceeds the estimated additional cost incident to conducting the operation; or

The unitized operation of the pool or pools within the unit will prevent waste and protect the correlative rights of the owners in the pool or pools within the unit.

Each well permitted to be drilled, deepened, reopened, or converted to an injection well and operated in a unit shall conform to either the spacing standards established in KRS

353.610

, or to other unit spacing that shall be established by the department.

All unit operations and production shall be deemed, for all purposes, as the conduct of operations and production upon each of the separately-owned tracts and interests in the unit.

A unitization order issued in accordance with this section shall:

Authorize the unit operation of a pool or pools, including drilling, deepening, reopening, conversion to injection wells, and operation of all wells within the unit for the production of oil and gas from the unit:

Designate the unit operator of the operation;

Approve a unit operating agreement;

Provide for the allocation of production and reserves among all separately-owned tracts and interests in the unit;

Provide for the proportionate allocation of all reasonable costs and expenses of unit operations as these costs and expenses are set out in the approved operating agreement. Costs and expenses shall be allocated among all participating owners of operating interests who elect to participate in the proportion that the separately-owned tracts and interests share in the production of the unit; and

Establish the spacing approved for the unit.

Any unitization order shall provide just and equitable alternatives whereby an owner of an operating interest who does not elect to participate in the risk and cost of developing the unit may elect to surrender his interest, or a portion of it, to the participating owners on a reasonable basis and for a reasonable consideration, which if not agreed upon, shall be determined by the department; or elect to participate in the development of the unit on a carried basis on terms and conditions which, if not agreed upon, shall be determined by the department to be just and reasonable. If a dispute arises as to the costs of operating and developing a unit, then the department shall determine and apportion the costs within ninety (90) days after the date of written notification to the department of the existence of the dispute; however, any person disputing an actual or proposed expenditure shall file notice of the disputed costs within one (1) year after notice of the actual or proposed expenditure was received by the person filing the dispute.

An order establishing a unit may be modified, altered, extended, vacated, or otherwise amended by the department after notice as prescribed in this section and a demonstration by affected persons of a significant change of circumstances supporting the amendment.

An amendment to extend or enlarge the unit area shall be agreed upon in writing by documented owners of at least a fifty-one percent (51%) ownership in the interests in the pool or pools in the unit;

An amendment of a unitization order enlarging a unit shall allocate to each tract or interest in the unit, as amended, a portion of the total production of oil or gas, or both, from the unit so enlarged, in proportion to the contribution of the tract or interest to the unit during the remaining course of unit operations, and shall supersede and be in lieu of the allocation of production provided for in any previously-established unit and shall have an effective date provided for in the order.

Wells drilled, deepened, or reopened for the injection of water, gas, or other fluids into any subsurface formation shall be governed by applicable state and federal statutes and regulations.

Any order or final determination of the department under this section shall be subject to review in accordance with KRS

353.700

and any administrative regulations promulgated thereunder.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 431, § 2, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 318, § 342, effective July 15, 1996; 2018 ch. 94, § 10, effective July 14, 2018.

353.650.
Exclusion of royalty interest in computing share of production — Limitation.

If one (1) or more of the owners of any operating interest in any portion of the pooled tract shall drill, deepen or reopen and operate, or pay the costs of drilling, deepening or reopening and operating a well for the benefit of another owner of an opening interest, as provided in the pooling order, then such owner or owners shall be entitled to the proceeds from the share of production from the tracts or portions thereof pooled accruing to the interest of such other owner, exclusive of any royalty reserved in any lease or leases of such tracts or portions thereof or exclusive of one-eighth (1/8) of production attributable to all unleased tracts or portions thereof, until such proceeds equal the sums payable by or charged to the interest of the other owner plus a reasonable charge for interest on such sums.

If a dispute shall arise as to the costs of drilling, deepening or reopening, and operating a well, the director of the Division of Oil and Gas shall determine and apportion the costs.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 103, § 17; 2010, ch. 24, § 1910, effective July 15, 2010.